Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2365.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 573.16, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. a. The public corporation, the principal contractor, any claimant for labor or material who has filed a claim, or the surety on any bond given for the performance of the contract, may, at any time after the expiration of thirty days, and not later than sixty days, following the completion and final acceptance of said improvement, bring action in equity in the county where the improvement is located to adjudicate all rights to said fund, or to enforce liability on said bond. Senate File 2365, p. 2 b. No later than fourteen calendar days after final acceptance of the improvement, the public corporation shall send to the principal contractor, the surety on any bond given for the performance of the contract, and any claimant for labor or material who has filed a claim, a written notification of the date of the public corporationâs final acceptance of the improvement. The public corporation shall not be liable for any claims or damages based on or arising out of the public corporationâs failure to comply with this paragraph. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2365, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor